Maryland, session 2025, HB0694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1 THEREAFTER,
EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE AND REPORT, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE NUMBER OF MAIN ENTRANCES TO PUBLIC SCHOOL
BUILDINGS IN THE COUNTY THAT ARE NOT ACCESSIBLE FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH
DISABILITIES AND NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH
DISABILITIES ACT.
7–435.
(a) On or before December 1, 2017, the Department shall, in consultation with
disability advocacy groups, update the Emergency Planning Guidelines for Local School
Systems and Schools to accommodate, safeguard, and evacuate students, staff, and visitors
with disabilities on public school grounds in accordance with the federal Americans with
Disabilities Act.
(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2018, each local school system shall update the local
school system’s emergency plan to comply with the update of the Department’s guidelines
and regulations under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) (I) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH
SEPTEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL SEND A COPY OF
THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM’S EMERGENCY PLAN TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(II) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER
1 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 694 3
1. ANALYZE THE EMERGENCY PLANS RECEIVED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON WHETHER
EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE DEPARTMENT’S
GUIDELINES AND REGULATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) If a student with an IEP requires specific accommodations for evacuation in
an emergency, the student’s IEP shall include accommodations for the student during an
emergency.
(d) If a student with a 504 plan requires specific accommodations for evacuation
in an emergency, the student’s 504 team shall discuss and address the student’s needs as
necessary.
7–1510.
(a) On or before June 15, 2019, and regularly thereafter, each local school system
shall conduct a safety evaluation of each public school under the local school system’s
jurisdiction to:
(1) Identify and, if necessary, develop solutions for physical safety
concerns, including issues with building security AND ASSOCIATED ISSUES OF
ACCESSIBILITY FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES; and
(2) Identify and evaluate any patterns of safety concerns on school property
or at school–sponsored events.
(b) In performing the safety evaluations, each designated safety coordinator shall:
(1) Consult with the Center for guidance;
(2) Coordinate with the Interagency Commission on School Construction’s
facility assessment process, established under § 5–310 of this article in identifying issues
with public school facilities that could impact school safety; and
(3) Submit a summary of the completed safety evaluations to the Center.
(d) On or before August 1, 2020, and regularly thereafter, each local school system
shall update the school emergency plan for each public school in the school system’s
jurisdiction to:
(1) Include detailed plans for the manner in which each public school will
address:

HOUSE BILL 694
(i) Behavioral threats;
(ii) Emergency events; and
(iii) Accommodations for students with disabilities in emergency
events;
(2) Conform with the Emergency Planning Guidelines updated under
subsection (c) of this section; and
(3) Incorporate any changes required under subsection (f) of this section.
(e) Each local school system shall submit the plans updated under subsection (d)
of this section to the Center for review and comment.
(f) (1) On or before August 1, 2020, and each August 1 thereafter, each local
school system shall submit a report to the Center that includes, for the immediately
preceding school year:
(i) Aggregate data about threats made against any school or school
system facility;
(ii) Information about any school lockdowns, evacuations, or other
emergency responses that occurred;
(III) INSTANCES IN WHICH A PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY BECAME
INACCESSIBLE FOR A STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY IN A MANNER THAT COULD
IMPEDE EVACUATION OR AN EMERGENCY RESPONSE;
[(iii)] (IV) Incidents in which a public school’s emergency plan failed
in part or in whole to function as anticipated in an emergency or an emergency drill; and
[(iv)] (V) School hours spent in an emergency or an emergency drill.
(2) Each local school system shall, in consultation with the Center, update
each emergency plan to correct weaknesses identified under paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.